Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB369.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5919.1. Informant testimony.(a) Use of informant testimony.--Except as provided under subsection (c), in any criminal proceeding or capital case in which the prosecution attempts to introduce evidence of incriminating statements made by the accused to or overheard by an informant, the prosecution shall, at least 30 days prior to a relevant evidentiary hearing or trial, timely disclose in discovery:(1) All names, known aliases, inmate identification numbers and date of birth of the informant.(2) The complete criminal history of the informant, 123456789101112131415161718 including any charges pending or charges which were reduced or dismissed as part of a plea agreement.(3) The informant's cooperation agreement with the prosecution, including any deal, promise, inducement or benefit that the offering party has made or may make to the informant in the future.(4) All statements, including inconsistent and inculpatory, allegedly made by the accused to the informant.(5) The time and place of the alleged statements, the time and place of the disclosure to law enforcement officials and the names of all individuals who were present when the alleged statements were made.(6) Whether at any time the informant recanted the testimony or statement and, if so, the time and place of the recantation, the nature of the recantation and the names of the individuals who were present at the recantation.(7) Other cases in which the informant testified, provided that the existence of the testimony can be ascertained through reasonable inquiry and whether the informant received any promise, inducement or benefit in exchange for or subsequent to the testimony or statement.(8) Any lawful audio or audio-visual recording made of a statement by an informant to law enforcement officials, including any deal, promise, inducement or other benefit offered to the informant.(9) Any other information relevant to the informant's credibility.(b) Reliability hearing.--Except as provided under subsection (c), in any case under subsection (a), the prosecution shall disclose at least 30 days prior to any 20250SB0369PN0317 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relevant evidentiary hearing or trial the prosecution's intent to introduce the testimony of an informant. The following procedures shall apply:(1) The court shall conduct a hearing to determine whether the testimony of the informant is reliable and admissible, unless the defendant waives the hearing.(2) If the prosecution fails to show by a preponderance of the evidence that the informant's testimony is reliable, the court may not allow the testimony to be heard at trial.(3) Inclusive of the disclosures under subsection (a), the court shall consider the following factors:(i) The extent to which the informant's testimony is confirmed by other evidence.(ii) The specificity of the testimony.(iii) The extent to which the testimony contains details known only by the perpetrator of the alleged offense.(iv) The extent to which the details of the testimony could be obtained from a source other than the defendant.(v) The circumstances under which the informant initially provided information supporting the testimony to a law enforcement officer.(c) Exception to notice requirement.--The court may permit the prosecution to disclose the prosecution's intent to introduce the testimony of an informant with less notice than the 30 days required under subsections (a) and (b) if the court finds that the informant was not known prior to the 30-day period and could not have been discovered or obtained by the exercise of due diligence by the prosecution prior to the 30-day 20250SB0369PN0317 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 period. Upon good cause shown, the court may set a reasonable notice period under the circumstances or may continue the trial on the court's own motion to allow for a reasonable notice period, which motion shall toll the prompt trial period under Pa.R.Crim.P. No. 600 (relating to prompt trial) for the period of the continuance.(d) Victim notification.--(1) A prosecutor shall make reasonable efforts to notify a victim if the prosecutor has decided to offer or provide any of the following benefits to an informant in exchange for, or as a result of, the informant offering or providing testimony against a suspect or defendant:(i) Reduction or dismissal of charges.(ii) A plea bargain.(iii) Support for a modification of the amount or conditions of bail.(iv) Support for a motion to reduce or modify a sentence.(2) If the informant is still in custody, the prosecutor shall attempt to give notice before an informant is released from custody. Efforts to notify a victim must include, in order of priority:(i) Contacting the victim or a person designated by the victim by telephone.(ii) Contacting the victim by mail.(3) If a prosecutor notifies a victim of domestic violence, any criminal sex offense or harassment or stalking under 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses), the prosecutor shall also inform the victim of the method and benefits of seeking an order for protection from abuse 20250SB0369PN0317 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pursuant to 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to protection from abuse).(4) The notification under this subsection shall be in addition to the notification requirements and rights provided for under the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act.(e) Internal records.--(1) Each prosecuting entity's office shall maintain records of informants in an internal database for a period of 20 years from the date that the informant's information was entered into the internal database. Informant information shall be recorded and maintained regardless of whether the informant testified or the testimony was presented at trial. The information to be collected must include the following:(i) The docket number of the case in which the informant testified or planned to testify.(ii) The name of the informant, including any known aliases or alternative spellings.(iii) The date of birth of the informant.(iv) The substance and use of any testimony of an informant.(v) The informant's cooperation agreement with the prosecution and any benefit the prosecution has offered or may offer in the future to the informant in connection with the testimony.(2) Information collected and records maintained under this subsection are confidential and exempt from access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law. Only the prosecuting entity may access internal records but may provide information on a specific 20250SB0369PN0317 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 informant to another prosecuting entity upon request and as required by this section when disclosing discoverable evidence.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Benefit." A plea agreement, bail consideration, reduction or modification of sentence or any other leniency, immunity, financial payment, reward or amelioration of current or future conditions of incarceration offered or provided in connection with, or in exchange for, testimony that is offered or provided by an informant."Informant." As follows:(1) An individual who is purporting to testify about admissions made to the individual by the accused while detained or incarcerated in a penal institution contemporaneously.(2) The term does not include a codefendant or confidential informant who does not provide testimony against a suspect or defendant."Prosecuting entity." A county district attorney's office or the Office of Attorney General.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0369PN0317 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223